Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.175

Interfering with search and rescue dog.

(1)(a)(i) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior is interfering with the use of an on-duty search and rescue dog who continues with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of an on-duty search and rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the search and rescue dog user or his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except when (a)(ii) of this subsection applies.

(ii) A second or subsequent violation of (a)(i) of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b)(i) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog to interfere with the use of an on-duty search and rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the search and rescue dog user or his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except when (b)(ii) of this subsection applies.

(ii) A second or subsequent violation of (b)(i) of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or causes the death of an on-duty search and rescue dog is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog to injure, disable, or cause the death of an on-duty search and rescue dog is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the death of an on-duty search and rescue dog is guilty of a class C felony.

(4) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized control over an on-duty search and rescue dog with the intent to deprive the dog user of his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030.

(5)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential expenses incurred by the search and rescue dog user and the dog that arise out of, or are related to, the criminal offense.

(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include, but is not limited to:

(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased dog, the training of a replacement search and rescue dog, or retraining of the affected dog and all related veterinary and care expenses; and

(ii) Medical expenses of the search and rescue dog user, training of the dog user, and compensation for any wages or earned income lost by the search and rescue dog user as a result of a violation of subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section.

(6) Nothing in this section affects any civil remedies available for violation of this section.

(7) For purposes of this section, "search and rescue dog" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of search and rescue of persons lost or missing.

[ 2005 c 212 s 1.]